vi: Hiệu ứng chất bôi trơn: Làm mát; Trì hoãn; Siêu trơn; Có hương vị; Bôi trơn; Không bôi trơn; Diệt tinh trùng; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Châm chích; Làm ấm; Khác
nb: Glidemiddeleffekt: Avkjøling; Forsinkelse; Ekstra glidemiddel; Smaksatt; Med glidemiddel; Uten glidemiddel; Sæddrepende; Standard; Prikking; Oppvarming; Annet
pl: Efekt lubrykantu: Chłodzenie; Opóźnienie; Dodatkowo nawilżony; Aromat; Nawilżony; Nienawilżony; Plemnikobójczy; Standard; Mrowienie; Nagrzewanie; Inne
fi: Liukasteen vaikutus: Viilennys; Viive; Erittäin liukas; Maustettu; Liukastettu; Liukastamaton; Siittiöitä tuhoava; Tavallinen; Kihelmöivä; Lämpeneminen; Muu
zh-CN: 润滑剂效果: 冷却; 延迟; 超润滑; 调味; 润滑; 无润滑; 杀精; 标准; 刺痛感; 温热; 其他
hr-HR: Učinak lubrikanta: Hlađenje; Odgoda; Ekstra podmazano; Aromatizirani; Podmazano; Nepodmazano; Spermicidno; Standardni; Trnci; Zagrijavanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Efeito do lubrificante: Refrescante; Delay; Extra lubrificado; Saborizado; Lubrificado; Não lubrificado; Espermicida; Padrão; Formigamento; Aquecimento; Outro
tr: Kayganlaştırıcı etkisi: Soğutucu; Delay; Ekstra kayganlaştırıcılı; Aromalı; Kayganlaştırıcılı; Kayganlaştırıcısız; Sperm öldürücü; Standart; Karıncalanma hissi; Isıtma; Diğer
ko: 윤활제 효과: 쿨링; 지연; 초강력 윤활; 가향; 윤활; 무윤활; 살정제; 표준; 따끔거림; 데우기; 기타
fr: Effet lubrifiant: Rafraîchissant; Retard; Extra lubrifié; Aromatisé; Lubrifié; Non lubrifié; Spermicide; Standard; Picotement; Chauffant; Autre
th: ผลของสารหล่อลื่น: ระบายความร้อน; ดีเลย์; หล่อลื่นพิเศษ; แต่งกลิ่น; หล่อลื่น; ไม่หล่อลื่น; ฆ่าอสุจิ; มาตรฐาน; รู้สึกเสียวซ่า; ให้ความรู้สึกที่อบอุ่น; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Učinek lubrikanta: Hlajenje; Zamik; Dodatno navlažen; Aromatiziran; Navlažen; Nenavlažen; Spermicidni; Standarden; Mravljinčenje; Ogrevanje; Drugo
zh-TW: 潤滑劑效果: 冰鎮; 延遲; 特潤; 風味; 潤滑; 無潤滑; 殺精; 標準; 刺激感; 溫熱感; 其他
lt-LT: Lubrikanto poveikis: Vėsinamasis; „Delay“ (delsa); Papildomai suteptas; Aromatizuotas; Suteptas; Nesuteptas; Spermicidinis; Standartinis; Dilgčiojimas; Šildantis; Kita
nl: Glijmiddeleffect: Koeling; Vertraging; Extra glijmiddel; Op smaak gebracht; Met glijmiddel; Zonder glijmiddel; Sperma dodend; Standaard; Tintelend; Verwarmend; Andere
it: Effetto del lubrificante: Raffreddante; Delay; Extra lubrificato; Aromatizzato; Lubrificato; Non lubrificato; Spermicida; Standard; Formicolio; Riscaldante; Altro
en: Lubricant effect: Cooling; Delay; Extra lubricated; Flavored; Lubricated; Non-lubricated; Spermicidal; Standard; Tingling; Warming; Other
cs: Účinek lubrikantu: Chladivý; Zpoždění; Extra lubrikovaný; S příchutí; Lubrikovaný; Nelubrikovaný; Spermicidní; Standardní; Brnění; Zahřívání; Jiné
sv: Glidmedelseffekt: Kylning; Fördröjning; Extra glidsamt; Smaksatt; Glidsamt; Icke-glidsamt; Spermiedödande; Standard; Pirrande; Värmande; Övrigt
ru: Эффект смазки: Охлаждение; Задержка; Особо смазанный; Ароматизированный; Смазанный; Несмазанный; Спермицидный; Стандартный; Покалывающий; Согревающий; Другой
sk-SK: Účinok lubrikantu: Chladenie; Oneskorenie; Extra lubrikovaný; Ochutený; Lubrikovaný; Nelubrikovaný; Spermicídny; Štandardný; Mravčivý; Otepľovanie; Iné
hu: Síkosító hatás: Hűtő; Késleltetés; Extra síkosított; Ízesített; Síkosított; Nem síkosított; Spermicid; Normál; Bizsergető; Melegítő; Egyéb
es: Efecto del lubricante: Refrescante; Retardo; Extra lubricado; Saborizado; Lubricado; No lubricado; Espermicida; Estándar; Hormigueo; Calentamiento; Otros
pt-PT: Efeito do lubrificante: Arrefecimento; Atraso; Extra lubrificado; Aromatizado; Lubrificado; Não lubrificado; Espermicida; Padrão; Formigueiro; Aquecimento; Outro
ro-RO: Efect lubrifiant: Răcoritor; Întârziere; Extra lubrifiat; Aromatizat; Lubrifiat; Nelubrifiat; Spermicid; Standard; Furnicături; Încălzire; Altele
el: Επίδραση λιπαντικού: Ψύξη; Καθυστέρηση; Έξτρα λιπαντικό; Αρωματισμένο; Λιπαντικό; Χωρίς λιπαντικό; Σπερματοκτόνο; Κανονικό; Μυρμήγκιασμα; Θέρμανση; Άλλο
ja: 潤滑剤効果: クーリング; ディレイ; 特潤滑; フレーバード; 潤滑; 潤滑なし; 殺精子剤入り; スタンダード; ピリピリ感; 温める; その他
bg-BG: Ефект на лубриканта: Охлаждане; Забавяне; Допълнително смазан; Ароматизиран; Смазан; Несмазан; Спермициден; Стандартно; Изтръпващ; Затоплящ; Други
de: Gleitmitteleffekt: Kühlung; Delay; Extra befeuchtet; Aromatisiert; Befeuchtet; Nicht befeuchtet; Spermizid; Standard; Prickelnd; Wärmend; Sonstiges
da: Glidemiddeleffekt: Kølende; Forsinkelse; Ekstra smurt; Tilsat smag; Smurt; Ikke-smurt; Sæddræbende; Standard; Prikkende; Varmende; Andet